Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 AUTHORIZING CITY ATTORNEYS TO PROSECUTE CERTAIN OFFENSES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.141, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Verification of petition. new text begin (a) new text end The petition shall be verified by the person having knowledge of the facts and may be on information and belief. Unless otherwise provided by this section or by rule or order of the court, the county attorney shall draft the petition upon the showing of reasonable grounds to support the petition. new text begin (b) The attorney of a statutory or home rule charter city in Hennepin County may draft and file the petition in cases where: new text end new text begin (1) the incident involves an offense committed against a peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (2) the county attorney declines to pursue a delinquency petition; and new text end new text begin (3) the violation is alleged to have occurred within the boundaries of the city. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to violations committed on or after that date and to violations committed before that date provided the juvenile court has jurisdiction over the matter pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, sections 260B.101 and 260B.193, subdivision 5. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 388.051, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Special provisions. (a) In Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Scott, and Washington Counties, only the county attorney shall prosecute gross misdemeanor violations of sections 289A.63, subdivisions 1, 2, 4, and 6; 297B.10; 609.255, subdivision 3; 609.377; 609.378; 609.41; and 617.247. (b) In Ramsey County, only the county attorney shall prosecute gross misdemeanor violations of sections 609.255, subdivision 3; 609.377; and 609.378. (c) The county attorney shall prosecute failure to report physical or sexual child abuse or neglect as provided under section 260E.08, paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), violations of fifth-degree criminal sexual conduct under section 609.3451, and environmental law violations under sections 115.071, 299F.098, and 609.671. (d) Except in Hennepin and Ramsey Counties, only the county attorney shall prosecute gross misdemeanor violations of section 152.025. new text begin (e) The attorney of a statutory or home rule charter city in Hennepin County may prosecute a violation of any statute identified in paragraphs (a) to (d) in cases where: new text end new text begin (1) the incident involves an offense committed against a peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (2) the county attorney declines to pursue a delinquency petition; and new text end new text begin (3) the violation is alleged to have occurred within the boundaries of the city. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date and to crimes committed before that date provided the limitations period in Minnesota Statutes, section 628.26, has not expired. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 484.87, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Prosecuting attorneys. new text begin (a) new text end Except as provided in subdivision 2 and as otherwise provided by law, violations of state law that are petty misdemeanors or misdemeanors must be prosecuted by the attorney of the statutory or home rule charter city where the violation is alleged to have occurred, if the city has a population greater than 600. If a city has a population of 600 or less, it may, by resolution of the city council, and with the approval of the board of county commissioners, give the duty to the county attorney. In cities of the first, second, and third class, gross misdemeanor violations of sections 609.52, 609.535, 609.595, 609.631, and 609.821 must be prosecuted by the attorney of the city where the violation is alleged to have occurred. The statutory or home rule charter city may enter into an agreement with the county board and the county attorney to provide prosecution services for any criminal offense. All other petty misdemeanors, misdemeanors, and gross misdemeanors must be prosecuted by the county attorney of the county in which the alleged violation occurred. All violations of a municipal ordinance, charter provision, rule, or regulation must be prosecuted by the attorney for the governmental unit that promulgated the municipal ordinance, charter provision, rule, or regulation, regardless of its population, or by the county attorney with whom it has contracted to prosecute these matters. new text begin (b) new text end In the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Scott, and Washington, violations of state law that are petty misdemeanors, misdemeanors, or gross misdemeanors except as provided in section 388.051, subdivision 2, must be prosecuted by the attorney of the statutory or home rule charter city where the violation is alleged to have occurred. The statutory or home rule charter city may enter into an agreement with the county board and the county attorney to provide prosecution services for any criminal offense. All other petty misdemeanors, misdemeanors, or gross misdemeanors must be prosecuted by the county attorney of the county in which the alleged violation occurred. All violations of a municipal ordinance, charter provision, rule, or regulation must be prosecuted by the attorney for the governmental unit that promulgated the municipal ordinance, charter provision, rule, or regulation or by the county attorney with whom it has contracted to prosecute these matters. new text begin (c) The attorney of a statutory or home rule charter city in Hennepin County may prosecute a felony violation of state law in cases where: new text end new text begin (1) the incident involves an offense committed against a peace officer, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (2) the county attorney declines to pursue a delinquency petition; and new text end new text begin (3) the violation is alleged to have occurred within the boundaries of the city. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date and to crimes committed before that date provided the limitations period in Minnesota Statutes, section 628.26, has not expired. new text end ARTICLE 2 CONFORMING CHANGES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.007, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Juvenile petty offender; juvenile petty offense. (a) "Juvenile petty offense" includes a juvenile alcohol offense, a juvenile controlled substance offense, a violation of section 609.685, or a violation of a local ordinance, which by its terms prohibits conduct by a child under the age of 18 years which would be lawful conduct if committed by an adult. (b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), "juvenile petty offense" also includes an offense that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult. (c) "Juvenile petty offense" does not include any of the following: (1) a misdemeanor-level violation of section 518B.01, 588.20, 609.224, 609.2242, 609.324, subdivision 2 or 3, 609.5632, 609.576, 609.66, 609.746, 609.748, 609.79, or 617.23; (2) a major traffic offense or an adult court traffic offense, as described in section 260B.225; (3) a misdemeanor-level offense committed by a child whom the juvenile court previously has found to have committed a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony offense; or (4) a misdemeanor-level offense committed by a child whom the juvenile court has found to have committed a misdemeanor-level juvenile petty offense on two or more prior occasions, unless the deleted text begin county attorneydeleted text end new text begin prosecuting authoritynew text end designates the child on the petition as a juvenile petty offender notwithstanding this prior record. As used in this clause, "misdemeanor-level juvenile petty offense" includes a misdemeanor-level offense that would have been a juvenile petty offense if it had been committed on or after July 1, 1995. (d) A child who commits a juvenile petty offense is a "juvenile petty offender." The term juvenile petty offender does not include a child alleged to have violated any law relating to being hired, offering to be hired, or agreeing to be hired by another individual to engage in sexual penetration or sexual conduct which, if committed by an adult, would be a misdemeanor. (e) Effective August 1, 2026, and applied to acts committed on or after that date, notwithstanding any contrary provision in paragraphs (a) to (d), a juvenile petty offender does not include a child who is alleged to have committed a juvenile petty offense before reaching the age of 13 years. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.163, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. deleted text begin County attorneydeleted text end new text begin Prosecuting authoritynew text end . The deleted text begin county attorneydeleted text end new text begin prosecuting authoritynew text end shall present the evidence upon request of the court. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.171, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public inspection of records. (a) Legal records arising from proceedings or portions of proceedings that are public under section 260B.163, subdivision 1, are open to public inspection. (b) Except as otherwise provided by this section, none of the records of the juvenile court and none of the records relating to an appeal from a nonpublic juvenile court proceeding, except the written appellate opinion, shall be open to public inspection or their contents disclosed except: (1) by order of a court; or (2) as required by chapter 245C or sections 245A.04, 611A.03, 611A.04, 611A.06, and 629.73. (c) The victim of any alleged delinquent act may, upon the victim's request, obtain the following information, unless it reasonably appears that the request is prompted by a desire on the part of the requester to engage in unlawful activities: (1) the name and age of the juvenile; (2) the act for which the juvenile was petitioned and date of the offense; and (3) the disposition, including, but not limited to, dismissal of the petition, diversion, probation and conditions of probation, detention, fines, or restitution. (d) The records of juvenile probation officers and county home schools are records of the court for the purposes of this subdivision. Court services data relating to delinquent acts that are contained in records of the juvenile court may be released as allowed under section 13.84, subdivision 6. This subdivision applies to all proceedings under this chapter, including appeals from orders of the juvenile court, except that this subdivision does not apply to proceedings under section 260B.335 or 260B.425 when the proceeding involves an adult defendant. The court shall maintain the confidentiality of adoption files and records in accordance with the provisions of laws relating to adoptions. In juvenile court proceedings any report or social history furnished to the court shall be open to inspection by the attorneys of record and the guardian ad litem a reasonable time before it is used in connection with any proceeding before the court. (e) When a judge of a juvenile court, or duly authorized agent of the court, determines under a proceeding under this chapter that a child has violated a state or local law, ordinance, or regulation pertaining to the operation of a motor vehicle on streets and highways, except parking violations, the judge or agent shall immediately report the violation to the commissioner of public safety. The report must be made on a form provided by the Department of Public Safety and must contain the information required under section 169.95. (f) A county attorney new text begin or city attorney new text end may give a law enforcement agency that referred a delinquency matter to the deleted text begin county attorneydeleted text end new text begin prosecuting authoritynew text end a summary of the results of that referral, including the details of any juvenile court disposition. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.335, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Petition; order to show cause. A request for jurisdiction over a person described in subdivision 1 shall be initiated by the filing of a verified petition by the deleted text begin county attorneydeleted text end new text begin prosecuting authoritynew text end having jurisdiction over the place where the child is found, resides, or where the alleged act of contributing occurred. A prior or pending petition alleging that the child is delinquent or a juvenile petty offender is not a prerequisite to a petition under this section. The petition shall allege the factual basis for the claim that the person is contributing to the child's delinquency or status as a juvenile petty offender. If the court determines, upon review of the verified petition, that probable cause exists to believe that the person has contributed to the child's delinquency or status as a juvenile petty offender, the court shall issue an order to show cause why the person should not be subject to the jurisdiction of the court. The order to show cause and a copy of the verified petition shall be served personally upon the person and shall set forth the time and place of the hearing to be conducted under subdivision 3. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.335, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Criminal proceedings. The deleted text begin county attorneydeleted text end new text begin prosecuting authoritynew text end may bring both a criminal proceeding under section 260B.425 and a civil action under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.425, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Complaint; venue. A complaint under this section may be filed by the deleted text begin county attorneydeleted text end new text begin prosecuting authoritynew text end having jurisdiction where the child is found, resides, or where the alleged act of contributing occurred. The complaint may be filed in either the juvenile or criminal divisions of the district court. A prior or pending petition alleging that the child is delinquent, a juvenile petty offender, or in need of protection or services is not a prerequisite to a complaint or a conviction under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 388.23, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority. The county attorney, or any deputy or assistant county attorney whom the county attorney authorizes in writing, deleted text begin hasdeleted text end new text begin and a city attorney prosecuting a suspected violation pursuant to section 388.051, subdivision 2, or 484.87, subdivision 3, havenew text end the authority to subpoena and require the production of any records of telephone companies, cellular phone companies, paging companies, subscribers of private computer networks including Internet service providers or computer bulletin board systems, electric companies, gas companies, water utilities, chemical suppliers, hotels and motels, pawn shops, airlines, buses, taxis, and other entities engaged in the business of transporting people, and freight companies, warehousing companies, self-service storage facilities, package delivery companies, and other entities engaged in the businesses of transport, storage, or delivery, and records of the existence of safe deposit box account numbers and customer savings and checking account numbers maintained by financial institutions and safe deposit companies, insurance records relating to the monetary payment or settlement of claims, the banking, credit card, and financial records of a subject of an identity theft investigation or a vulnerable adult, whether held in the name of the vulnerable adult or a third party, including but not limited to safe deposit, loan and account applications and agreements, signature cards, statements, checks, transfers, account authorizations, safe deposit access records and documentation of fraud, and wage and employment records of an applicant or recipient of public assistance who is the subject of a welfare fraud investigation relating to eligibility information for public assistance programs. Subpoenas may only be issued for records that are relevant to an ongoing legitimate law enforcement investigation. Administrative subpoenas may only be issued in welfare fraud and identity theft cases if there is probable cause to believe a crime has been committed. This provision applies only to the records of business entities and does not extend to private individuals or their dwellings. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 390.251, is amended to read: 390.251 REQUEST FOR EXAMINATIONS. The coroner or medical examiner may, when requested, make physical examinations and tests incident to any matter of a criminal nature under consideration by the district court or county attorney, law enforcement agency, new text begin city attorney prosecuting a suspected violation pursuant to section 388.051, subdivision 2, or 484.87, subdivision 3, new text end or publicly appointed criminal defense counsel, and shall deliver a copy of a report of such tests and examinations to the person making the request. Such an examination does not establish a doctor-patient relationship. The person making the request shall pay the cost of such examinations and tests. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end